District of Columbia statutes.
16-303

Persons adopted.

A person, whether a minor or an adult, may be adopted.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 537, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-303.
1973 Ed., § 16-303.